Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3332
Financial institution; fees authorized.

A financial institution may charge a reasonable fee, not to exceed actual cost, to be paid by the department for the service of reporting matches as required by section 43-3330 and may charge a fee, not to exceed actual cost, to be paid by the department for the necessary upgrades to an existing system that are directly related to compliance with section 43-3330 and that have been approved by the department.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 32.